Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.240

Persons licensed to provide health care or related services, employees, hospitals, clinics, etc.—Professional review committee, society, examining, licensing or disciplinary board members, etc.—Immunity from civil suit.

(1)(a) A person licensed by this state to provide health care or related services including, but not limited to, an acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner, a physician, osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatric physician and surgeon, chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist, pharmacist, optician, physician assistant, osteopathic physician's assistant, nurse practitioner, including, in the event such person is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative;

(b) An employee or agent of a person described in subparagraph (a) of this subsection, acting in the course and scope of his or her employment, including, in the event such employee or agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative; or

(c) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or institution employing one or more persons described in subparagraph (a) of this subsection, including, but not limited to, a hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or an officer, director, trustee, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course and scope of his or her employment, including in the event such officer, director, employee, or agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative;

shall be immune from civil action for damages arising out of the good faith performance of their duties on such committees, where such actions are being brought by or on behalf of the person who is being evaluated.

(2) No member, employee, staff person, or investigator of a professional review committee shall be liable in a civil action as a result of acts or omissions made in good faith on behalf of the committee; nor shall any person be so liable for filing charges with or supplying information or testimony in good faith to any professional review committee; nor shall a member, employee, staff person, or investigator of a professional society, of a professional examining or licensing board, of a professional disciplinary board, of a governing board of any institution, or of any employer of professionals be so liable for good faith acts or omissions made in full or partial reliance on recommendations or decisions of a professional review committee or examining board.

[ 2019 c 308 s 14; 2010 c 286 s 11; 1995 c 323 s 1; 1985 c 326 s 25; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 114 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 157 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 308: See note following RCW 18.06.010.

Intent—2010 c 286: See RCW 18.06.005.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 4.16.350.